Utah statutes.
61-2c-507.   Division subrogated -- Authority to revoke license.

(1)  If the division pays a person from the fund in accordance with this part:

(a)  the division is subrogated to the rights of that person for the amounts paid out of the fund; and

(b)  any amount and interest recovered by the division shall be deposited in the fund.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), the license of a licensee for whom payment from the fund is made under this part is automatically revoked as of the earlier of the day on which:

(i)  the division is ordered by a court to pay from the fund; or

(ii)  the division pays from the fund.

(b) (i)  A person whose license is revoked under Subsection (2)(a) may appeal the revocation in a de novo hearing conducted by the commission:

(A)  after the revocation; and

(B)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(ii)  The commission may delegate:

(A)  to the division or an administrative law judge the authority to conduct a hearing described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); or

(B)  to the division the authority to make a decision on whether relief from a revocation should be granted.

(3)  Unless the revocation is not upheld after a hearing described in Subsection (2)(b), a licensee whose license is revoked pursuant to Subsection (2) may not apply for a new license until the licensee pays into the fund:

(a)  the amount paid out of the fund on behalf of the licensee; and

(b)  interest at a rate determined by the division with the concurrence of the commission.



Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

